Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.05.070

Secretary of state to deliver copies.

The Washington secretary of state is authorized and directed to immediately deliver copies of this initiative, when enacted, to the following persons: The governor of the state of Washington, all current members of the Washington state legislature, all current members of the United States congress, and the president of the United States.

[ 2017 c 1 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 735, approved November 8, 2016).]